Hawaii statutes.
[§286-118.5] License revoked for
operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant; eligibility for
license renewal. [Section effective until December 31, 2015. For
section effective January 1, 2016, see below.] Notwithstanding any other
law to the contrary, any person arrested for a violation of section 291E-61 or
291E-61.5 after December 31, 2010, whose license is revoked pursuant to this
part or section 291E-61, and who otherwise qualifies for a permit under section
291E-44.5 or 291E-61, may apply for a renewal or reactivation of a driver's
license as provided in section 286-107 or 286-107.5; provided that:

(1) The license renewal or reactivation shall be for
the sole purpose of obtaining or extending a permit issued pursuant to section
291E-44.5 or 291E-61;

(2) No physical driver's license shall be issued to
the person; and

(3) The driver's license shall expire as provided in
section 286-106 or upon the end of the revocation period, whichever occurs
first. [L 2012, c 327, §2]

§286-118.5 License revoked for operating a
vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant; eligibility for license renewal.
[Section effective January 1, 2016. For section effective until December
31, 2015, see above.] (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
any person arrested for a violation of section 291E-61 or 291E-61.5 after
December 31, 2010, whose license is revoked pursuant to this part or section
291E-61, and who otherwise qualifies for a permit under section 291E-44.5 or
291E-61, may apply for a renewal or reactivation of a driver's license as
provided in section 286-107 or 286-107.5.

(b) A person may apply for relicensing under
subsection (a); provided that:

(1) The license renewal or reactivation shall be for
the sole purpose of obtaining or extending a permit issued pursuant to section
291E-44.5 or 291E-61;

(2) No physical driver's license shall be issued to
the person; and

(3) The driver's license shall expire as provided in
section 286-106 or upon the end of the revocation period, whichever occurs
first.

(c) A holder of a valid ignition interlock
permit may take any tests necessary to apply for relicensing no sooner than
thirty days prior to expiration of the revocation period; provided that the
driver's license shall not be issued until the completion of the revocation
period. [L 2012, c 327, §2; am L 2015, c 40, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next